District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Automated Curbside Management System Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 302 of the District of Columbia Traffic Adjudication Act of 1978, effective
September 12, 1978 (D.C. Law 2-104; 25 DCR 1275), is amended to read as follows:
“(a) The District Department of Transportation (“DDOT”) shall establish an Automated
Curbside Management System that manages the use of curbside space through:
“(1) Cameras, sensors, or other technology that obtain and transmit real-time
information regarding the use of curbside space;
“(2) An automated payment system that can charge, invoice, or otherwise collect
payment from individuals for the lawful use of curbside space, including through an account-based
or subscription system available through a browser-based or mobile application; and


“(3) The issuance of fines or the assessment of points against individuals or their
motor vehicles for the unlawful use of curbside space, including parking and other non-moving
violations.
“(b) The Automated Curbside Management System may use dynamic pricing that adjusts
fees for the use of curbside space based on duration, location, time of day, and current demand.
“(c)(1) DDOT shall establish within its Automated Curbside Management System a Smart
Loading Program that manages curbside space reserved for picking up and dropping off passengers
or loading and unloading goods through an automated payment system as described in subsection
(a)(2) of this section.
“(2) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this section, DDOT shall issue
regulations for the Smart Loading Zones Program (“Program”) that include:
“(A) A description of locations where Smart Loading Zones are established
and the hours during which Smart Loading Zones are in effect;
“(B) A description of how individuals or businesses can enroll in the
Program, including any restrictions or eligibility criteria;
“(C) A fee schedule for the lawful use of Smart Loading Zones;
“(D) A fine schedule for the unlawful use of Smart Loading Zones; and
“(E) The process by which individuals and businesses are notified of, and
can contest the issuance of, a fee or fine.
“(3)(A) No later than six months after the effective date of this section, DDOT shall
begin operating the Program.
“(B) DDOT may, for the first month during which the Program is in effect,
issue warning citations that do not impose a monetary penalty.


“(d)(1) DDOT may contract with a third-party vendor to implement the requirements of
this section.
“(2) For any request for proposal or any other solicitation of a contract related to
the implementation of the requirements of this section as authorized under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, DDOT shall prioritize applicants whose technology provides, or can provide,
additional functionality, such as:
“(A) Automated lane enforcement;
“(B) Automated traffic enforcement for moving violations; and
“(C) Dynamic pricing.
“(e) For the purposes of this section, the term “curbside space” means the space within a
street or road adjacent to the curb designated for parking, picking up and dropping off passengers,
or loading and unloading goods, excluding parking spaces managed by the Residential Permit
Parking (“RPP”) Program administered pursuant to 18 DCMR § 4232 et seq.
Sec. 3. The Commercial Curbside Loading Zone Implementation Act of 2009, effective
October 22, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-66; 56 DCR 6608), is repealed.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,


1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.